District of Columbia statutes.
31-5607.02

Prohibitions on use of information.

The Commissioner or an employee of the Commissioner shall not use for personal gain or benefit information filed with or obtained by the Commissioner which is not public information. The Commissioner or an employee of the Commissioner shall not conduct securities dealings based upon information filed with or obtained by the Commissioner, even though public, if there has not been sufficient time for the securities markets to assimilate the information.

History

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 702, 47 DCR 7837